Washington statutes.
RCW 35.21.760

Legal interns—Employment authorized.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the city attorney, corporation counsel, or other chief legal officer of any city or town may employ legal interns as otherwise authorized by statute or court rule.

[ 1974 ex.s. c 7 s 1.]